Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1215.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(f.1)(3)(vi) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended by adding subclauses to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(f.1) * * *(3) * * *(vi) * * *(G.1) The reimbursement for any compound drug shall be calculated on a per ingredient basis as determined in accordance 1234567891011121314151617181920 with subclause (A). If any individual ingredient does not have a valid and recognized NDC number, the compound drug shall not be reimbursed. The following shall apply:(I) A retail pharmacy, mail order pharmacy or physician shall be reimbursed a single compounding fee of twenty dollars ($20) per prescription filled and dispensed.(II) In no instance shall reimbursement for a compound drug exceed four hundred dollars ($400) per thirty-day supply or a prorated amount if the supply is greater or less than thirty days.(III) A compound drug that is essentially a duplicate of a commercially available drug product is not reimbursable. The status of a compound drug as essentially a duplicate of a commercially available drug product shall be determined pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 353b (relating to outsourcing facilities).(G.2) The reimbursement for any noncompound topical drug shall be the lesser of one hundred and ten per centum of the AWP, the Federal Upper Limit as established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-8(e)(4) (relating to payment for covered outpatient drugs) and 42 CFR 447.514 (relating to upper limits for multiple source drugs) or two hundred forty dollars ($240) for a thirty-day supply, prorated if the supply is greater or less than thirty days, plus a single dispensing fee of ten dollars ($10) per prescription.* * *(J) As used in this subclause:"Compound drug" shall mean a non-Food and Drug Administration approved pharmaceutical preparation that is prescribed by a physician and prepared by a licensed pharmacist or physician by 20260SB1215PN1502 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 combining, mixing or altering ingredients to tailor a medication to the needs of an individual employe, including when a commercially available Food and Drug Administration-approved drug is not suitable to meet those needs. The term includes, but is not limited to, dermatological agents or topical preparations such as creams, gels, ointments and transdermal patches formulated using bulk ingredients or commercially available products that are combined or altered outside of Food and Drug Administration-approved labeling."Topical drug" shall mean a drug or medication applied to the skin with intention to provide a localized or systemic result. The term shall include creams, gels, ointments and transdermal patches.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1215PN1502 - 3 - 123456789101112131415